West Virginia, session 2025, SB169.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Medicaid personal needs allowance. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that for the purpose of providing dignity for our elderly citizens, the Medicaid personal needs allowance should be increased. By increasing the personal needs allowance, senior citizens would be entitled to money for their personal needs, such as clothing, denture supplies, and other necessities. (b) Definition. – “Personal needs allowance” means the amount of monthly income a Medicaid-funded nursing home resident can keep of their personal income to spend on personal items and services. This includes, but is not limited to, cosmetic services, personal clothing, flowers and plants, and gifts purchased on behalf of a resident.(c) Enactment. – The Medicaid personal needs allowance shall be increased to $150 per month, effective July 1, 2026.